Maryland, session 2025, SB0368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “INSTRUCTIONAL TIME” MEANS ANY TIME DURING
THE SCHOOL DAY, EXCEPT A STUDENT’S LUNCH PERIOD.
(B) NOT LATER THAN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH COUNTY BOARD
SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY TO LIMIT THE USE OF CELLULAR
PHONES BY STUDENTS DURING INSTRUCTIONAL TIME.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0368*

SENATE BILL 368
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE
POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) PROHIBIT A STUDENT FROM USING A CELLULAR PHONE DURING
INSTRUCTIONAL TIME;
(2) REQUIRE A STUDENT TO STORE THE STUDENT’S CELLULAR
PHONE IN A SECURE PLACE DURING INSTRUCTIONAL TIME; AND
(3) PROHIBIT A STUDENT FROM USING THE SOCIAL MEDIA
APPLICATIONS AND SOCIAL MEDIA WEBSITES DETERMINED BY THE COUNTY BOARD
DURING SCHOOL HOURS.
(D) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT PROHIBIT A
STUDENT FROM USING A CELLULAR PHONE:
(1) FOR ANY PURPOSE DOCUMENTED IN THE STUDENT’S
INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR SECTION 504 PLAN;
(2) TO MONITOR OR ADDRESS A STUDENT’S DOCUMENTED HEALTH
ISSUE;
(3) DURING AN EMERGENCY EVENT; OR
(4) WHEN DIRECTED BY AN EDUCATOR OR ADMINISTRATOR FOR
EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES.
(E) (1) A POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE
APPROPRIATE DISCIPLINARY MEASURES FOR VIOLATIONS OF THE POLICY,
INCLUDING A WARNING FOR AN INITIAL VIOLATION.
(2) THE DISCIPLINARY MEASURES ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE ENFORCED BY AN ADMINISTRATOR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.